Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.1951

Gonzaga University alumni association license plates.

"Gonzaga University alumni association license plates" means license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display a symbol or artwork recognizing the efforts of the Gonzaga University alumni association in Washington state.

[ 2011 c 171 s 13; 2005 c 85 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.